Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 6. AMUSEMENTS--PUBLIC HOUSES OF

Art. 179e. TEXAS RACING ACT.

ARTICLE 2. TEXAS RACING COMMISSION

Without reference to the amendment of this section, this article was repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 3.01(1), eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2.02. MEMBERSHIP. (a) The commission consists of seven members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and two ex officio members who shall have the right to vote. The ex officio members are:

(1) the chairman of the Public Safety Commission or a member of the Public Safety Commission designated by the chairman of the Public Safety Commission; and

(2) the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee.

ARTICLE 6. RACETRACK LICENSES

Sec. 6.094. NATIONAL EVENT INCENTIVES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Breeders' Cup costs" means all costs for capital improvements and extraordinary expenses reasonably incurred for the operation of the Breeders' Cup races, including purses offered on other days in excess of the purses that the host association is required to pay by this Act.

(2) "Breeders' Cup races" means a series of thoroughbred races known as the Breeders' Cup Championship races conducted annually by Breeders' Cup Limited on a day known as Breeders' Cup Championship day.

(3) "Development organization" means an organization whose primary purpose is the marketing, promotion, or economic development of a city, county, or region of the state, including chambers of commerce, convention and visitors bureaus, and sports commissions.

(4) "Political subdivision" means a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state and includes any entity created by a political subdivision.

(b) An association conducting the Breeders' Cup races may apply to the reimbursement of Breeders' Cup costs amounts that would otherwise be set aside by the association for the state under Sections 6.091(a)(1) and 6.093 of this Act during the year in which the association hosts the Breeders' Cup races, limited to an amount equal to the lesser of the aggregate amount contributed to pay Breeders' Cup costs by political subdivisions and development organizations or $2 million. Beginning on January 1 of the year for which the association has been officially designated to host the Breeders' Cup races, amounts that would otherwise be set aside by the association for the state during that year under Sections 6.091(a)(1) and 6.093 of this Act shall be set aside, in accordance with procedures prescribed by the comptroller, for deposit into the Breeders' Cup Developmental Account. The Breeders' Cup Developmental Account is an account in the general revenue fund. The commission shall administer the account. Money in the account may be appropriated only to the commission and may be used only for the purposes specified in this section. The account is exempt from the application of Section 403.095, Government Code.

(c) The commission shall make disbursements from the Breeders' Cup Developmental Account to reimburse Breeders' Cup costs actually incurred and paid by the association, after the association files a request for reimbursement. Disbursements from the account may not at any time exceed the aggregate amount actually paid for Breeders' Cup costs by political subdivisions and development organizations, as certified by the commission to the comptroller, or $2 million, whichever is less.

(d) Not later than January 31 of the year following the year in which the association hosts the Breeders' Cup races, the association shall submit to the commission a report that shows:

(1) the total amount of Breeders' Cup costs incurred and paid by the association;

(2) the total payments made by political subdivisions and development organizations for Breeders' Cup costs; and

(3) any other information requested by the commission.

(e) Following receipt of the report required by Subsection (d) of this section, the commission shall take any steps it considers appropriate to verify the report. Not later than March 31 of the year following the event, the commission shall transfer to the credit of the general revenue fund any balance remaining in the Breeders' Cup Developmental Account after reimbursement of any remaining Breeders' Cup costs authorized under this section.

(f) In addition to the authority otherwise granted in this Act, the commission and the comptroller may adopt rules for the administration of this section as follows:

(1) the commission may adopt rules relating to:

(A) auditing or other verification of Breeders' Cup costs and amounts paid or set aside by political subdivisions and development organizations; and

(B) the disbursement of funds from the Breeders' Cup Developmental Account; and

(2) the comptroller may adopt rules relating to:

(A) procedures and requirements for transmitting or otherwise delivering to the treasury the money set aside under this section; and

(B) depositing funds into the Breeders' Cup Developmental Account.

(g) The commission may adopt rules to facilitate the conduct of the Breeders' Cup races, including the adoption of rules or waiver of existing rules relating to the overall conduct of racing during the Breeders' Cup races in order to assure the integrity of the races, licensing for all participants, special stabling and training requirements for foreign horses, and commingling of pari-mutuel pools.

(h) The provisions of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of this Act.

Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 19, Sec. 1, eff. Dec. 4, 1986. Sec. 1.03(7), (9), (11), (13) to (15), (19), (28), (32), (35), (46), (55) amended by and Sec. 1.03(58) to (66) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.02(c) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.05 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 63, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.08 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.10 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.15 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 2.16 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.021 added as art. 179e-4 by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 19, Sec. 8, eff. Dec. 4, 1986 and redesignated by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.04 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 8, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.05(b) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.07(a), (d), (e) amended by and Sec. 3.07(f), (g) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 10, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.08 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 4.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 12, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 4.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 13, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 4.04 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 14, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 4.05 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 15, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 4.06 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 16, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 5.01(b) amended by and Sec. 5.01(c) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 17, eff. Aug.26, 1991; Sec. 5.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 18, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 5.03(a), (b) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 19, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 5.04(c) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 20, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 21, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 22, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.02(g) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 23, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.03(a), (b), (e) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 24, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.03(h) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 25, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.03(i) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 26, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.031 added as art. 179e-3 by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 19, Sec. 7, eff. Dec. 4, 1986 and redesignated by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 68, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.04 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 27, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.05 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.06(a)(10) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 284(55), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Sec. 6.06(d), (h) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 28, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.08 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 29, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.09(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 30, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.09(b) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 5, Sec. 15.01; Sec. 6.09(d) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 30, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.09(e) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 30, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.091 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 31, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.10 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 32, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.11(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 5, Sec. 15.02; Sec. 6.13 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 33, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.14(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 34, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.16 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 35, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 63, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.17(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 36, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.17(d) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 37, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 6.17(e) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 6.18, 6.19 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 38, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 7.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 39, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 7.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 40, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 7.04(9) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 284(55), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Sec. 7.06 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 41, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 7.09 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 42, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 7.10 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 8.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 43, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 8.02(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 44, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 9.02, 9.03 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 45, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 9.05, 9.06 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 46, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 9.07 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 47, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 10.04 to 10.06 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 48, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 49, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.011 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 50, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.04(a) amended by and Sec. 11.04(d) added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 51, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.06 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 52, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.07 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 53, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.08 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 54, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 11.10 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 55, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 12.01, 12.02 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 56, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 12.03 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 57, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 13.02(c) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 58, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 14.03(b), (d) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 59, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Secs. 14.06, 14.07 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 60, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 15.01 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 61, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 15.03 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 62, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 15.04 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 63, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 16.14 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Secs. 17.01 to 17.06 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 74(b), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 18.01(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 64, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 18.01(a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 2.22, eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Sec. 18.03 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 65, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 18.05 amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 66, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 18.07 added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 386, Sec. 67, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Sec. 3.09(b) amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Sec. 5.04(b), (c) repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 790, Sec. 46(8), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Sec. 6.14(d) added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 405, Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 1993; Sec. 6.19(e) amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 405, Sec. 2, eff. June 2, 1993; Sec. 18.01(a) amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 970, Sec. 1.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Sec. 1.02 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 1.03(67) to (78) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 2.02(a), (b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 2.03 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 4, 1997; Sec. 2.05 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 2.07 repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 2.071 to 2.074 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 2.10 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 2.11(b) amended by and Sec. 2.11(d) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 2.12(b), (c) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 2.17 to 2.24 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 3.01 repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 3.02 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 3.021(b) amended and Sec. 3.021(d) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 3.03 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 3.07(a), (b), (d), (e) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 3.08(b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 3.13 to 3.22 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 5.01(a) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 5.03(a), (b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 5.05 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.01 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.02(b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 6.04(a), (d) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 6.06(a), (b), (e) to (g) amended and Sec. 6.06(i) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 6.061 to 6.063 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.08(b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.08(c) repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.09(b) repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.09(f) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.091 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1997; Secs. 6.092, 6.093 added by Acts, 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.01 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.02(a) amended and Sec. 7.02(c) to (e) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.04 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.05 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.07 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 7.10 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 9.01 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 10.04 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.011(g) amended by and Sec. 11.011(h) to (m) added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.04(c) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.04(d) repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.04(e)added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.06 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.08 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 11.09 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 13.03 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Secs. 14.01, 14.02, 14.04 to 14.07 amended by and Sec. 14.03 deleted by and Secs. 14.08 to 14.21 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 15.01 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 15.02 repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 16.021 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 6.11(b) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 16.12(a) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 18.01(a) amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 18.02 repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 18.06 amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 18.08 added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1275, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Sec. 1.03(21) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2002; Sec. 6.02(b) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 152, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Sec. 6.08(n) added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2002; Sec. 6.094 added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 334, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Sec. 6.17(b) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 153, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Sec. 9.03 amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2002; Sec. 11.011(e) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1263, Sec. 81, eff. Oct. 1, 2001; Sec. 16.14 amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 154, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Sec. 2.02(a) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 492, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 37.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Sec. 2.03(a) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 492, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 37.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Sec. 2.05(a) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 492, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 37.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Sec. 3.07(d) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Sec. 11.01(a) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Sec. 18.01(a) amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1112, Sec. 3.09, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 2701), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 2 (S.B. 2), Sec. 1.15, eff. July 10, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (H.B. 2271), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 684 (H.B. 254), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(166), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(167), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 57 (H.B. 1187), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 144 (H.B. 1186), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3123), Sec. 2.04, eff. June 18, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1106), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 3.01(1), eff. April 1, 2019.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 3.01(2), eff. April 1, 2019.